California statutes. Insurance Code
If claims and claim expenses paid by the authority due to earthquake events that commence on or after December 1, 2008, exhaust the total of all (a) the authority’s available capital, (b) the maximum amount of all insurer capital contributions and assessments pursuant to Sections 10089.15, 10089.23, and 10089.30, (c) all reinsurance actually available and under contract to the authority, (d) the maximum amount of all authority policyholder assessments pursuant to Section 10089.29, and (e) all capital committed and actually available from the private capital markets, the board, beginning December 1, 2008, for earthquake events commencing on or after December 1, 2008, shall have the power to assess participating insurance companies subject to the maximum limits in this section. Each participating insurer’s assessment shall be determined by multiplying the percentage share of the authority’s total gross written premium attributable to that participating insurer’s sales of authority insurance policies as of April 30 of the immediately preceding year, or the most recent year for which premium data not more than one year old are available, by the amount of the total assessment sought by the authority. The total amount of all assessments levied against participating insurance companies by the authority pursuant to this section shall not exceed one billion seven hundred eighty million dollars ($1,780,000,000), regardless of the frequency or severity of earthquake losses at any and all times subsequent to the creation of the authority. Once a participating insurer has paid pursuant to this section amounts equal to its percentage share of the authority’s total gross written premium, multiplied by one billion seven hundred eighty million dollars ($1,780,000,000) reduced as provided in paragraph (3) of subdivision (a) of Section 10089.23 from the maximum assessment, which is to be reduced periodically pursuant to subdivision (b) of Section 10089.33, or upon the earlier occurrence of the effective date stated in paragraph (6) of subdivision (b) of Section 10089.33, the authority’s power to assess that insurer under this section shall cease and the authority shall be prohibited from levying additional assessments on that insurer pursuant to this section. The assessment shall be limited to the amount necessary to pay the expected claims and claim expenses of the authority and return the authority’s available capital to three hundred fifty million dollars ($350,000,000), as determined by the board.

(History: Added by Stats. 2007, Ch. 303, Sec. 7.   Effective January 1, 2008.   Operative July 1, 2008, by second Sec. 8 of Ch. 303.)
-------------------------------------------

10089.32.

The authority shall endeavor at all times to make specific authority earthquake policyholder assessments, and the Treasurer shall endeavor at all times to secure debt financing, only for the actual funds reasonably estimated to be required for immediate authority operations.

(History: Added by Stats. 1995, Ch. 944, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1996.)
-------------------------------------------

10089.33.

(a) If the average daily balance of the authority’s available capital exceeds six billion dollars ($6,000,000,000) for the last 180 days of any calendar year, the board shall relieve all participating insurers of their obligation to pay additional earthquake loss assessments under Section 10089.30, by an aggregate amount equal to the amount of available capital in excess of six billion dollars ($6,000,000,000). Each December 31 thereafter, the board shall further reduce the aggregate assessment authorized under Section 10089.30 by the net increase in available capital in excess of the previous levels of available capital at which a reduction in the aggregate Section 10089.30 assessment was made. No reduction pursuant to this subdivision shall exceed 15 percent of the original aggregate Section 10089.30 assessment in any year of operation of the authority.

(b) Commencing April 1, 2010, and on each April 1 thereafter, but only in years that such relief is authorized by this subdivision, the board shall reduce the combined assessment obligation of all participating insurers under Section 10089.31 by 5 percent of the maximum aggregate Section 10089.31 assessment authorized as of January 1, 2009, as provided in this subdivision. Each year of Section 10089.31 assessment reduction is referred to in this subdivision as an “assessment-reduction year.” Assessment reductions shall take place as follows:

(1) Unless the authority has made payments and established appropriate reserves for claims and claim expenses, including for losses incurred but not reported, that in the aggregate exceeded five hundred million dollars ($500,000,000) on account of a single earthquake event commencing in 2009, as certified by the authority’s consulting actuary and accepted by the board, and the authority’s available capital as of January 1, 2010, did not exceed the authority’s available capital as of December 1, 2008, then effective April 1, 2010, the maximum aggregate Section 10089.31 assessment shall be reduced by an amount equal to the sum of an amount equal to 5 percent of the initial maximum aggregate Section 10089.31 assessment amount and an amount equal to the retained earnings differential, and 2009 shall be an assessment-reduction year.

(2) Unless the authority has made payments and established appropriate reserves for claims and claim expenses, including for losses incurred but not reported, that in the aggregate exceeded five hundred million dollars ($500,000,000) on account of a single earthquake event commencing in 2010, as certified by the authority’s consulting actuary and accepted by the board and the authority’s available capital as of January 1, 2011, did not exceed the authority’s available capital as of December 1, 2008, then effective April 1, 2011, the maximum aggregate Section 10089.31 assessment shall be reduced by an amount equal to the sum of an amount equal to 5 percent of the initial maximum aggregate Section 10089.31 assessment amount and an amount equal to the retained earnings differential, and 2010 shall be an assessment-reduction year.

(3) Beginning in 2012 and each year thereafter, unless the authority made payments and established appropriate reserves for claims and claim expenses, including for losses incurred but not reported, that in the aggregate exceeded five hundred million dollars ($500,000,000) on account of all earthquake events commencing in the preceding year, as certified by the authority’s consulting actuary and accepted by the board and the authority’s available capital as of January 1 of that year did not exceed the authority’s available capital as of December 1, 2008, then effective April 1 of that year, the maximum aggregate Section 10089.31 assessment shall be reduced by an amount equal to the sum of an amount equal to 5 percent of the initial maximum aggregate Section 10089.31 assessment amount and an amount equal to the retained earnings differential, and the preceding year shall be an assessment-reduction year.

(4) If through operation of this subdivision a year is not deemed an assessment-reduction year, no subsequent year shall be an assessment reduction year unless and until either the authority’s available capital as of a subsequent April 1 exceeds the authority’s available capital as of December 1, 2008; or the limitation established in paragraph (5), below, occurs.

(5) No more than two annual periods may be deemed not to constitute assessment-reduction years.

(6) Effective on the day after the last day of the 10th assessment-reduction year authorized by the board, the remaining maximum aggregate Section 10089.31 assessment shall be reduced to zero.

(7) As used in this section, “retained earnings differential” means the positive dollar-amount difference between: (A) the authority’s positive one-year retained-earnings growth for the preceding calendar year, minus (B) the authority’s capacity growth for the preceding calendar year, both calculated as of December 31. As used in this paragraph, “one-year retained-earnings growth” means the difference between the authority’s cumulative retained earnings at December 31 of the preceding calendar year and the authority’s cumulative retained earnings at December 31 of the year before the preceding calendar year, calculated in accordance with generally accepted accounting principles as of the preceding December 31. As used in this paragraph, the term “capacity growth” is the one-year amount of purchased risk transfer, such as reinsurance, or borrowed risk transfer such as bonds, put in place in the authority’s financial structure to account for the authority’s aggregate exposure growth over the preceding year ending December 31. The board shall be authorized and entitled, in its sole discretion, to make all final decisions regarding the authority’s level of financial strength and security and the authority’s choice and use of financing and risk-transfer mechanisms. As used in this paragraph, the term “aggregate exposure” means the aggregate of the limits of liability under all coverages of all earthquake insurance policies issued by the authority.

(c) In no event shall the board reinstate, in whole or in part, any assessment obligation it has reduced pursuant to this section.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2007, Ch. 303, first Sec. 8.   Effective January 1, 2008.   Operative July 1, 2008, by second Sec. 8 of Ch. 303.)
-------------------------------------------

10089.34.

(a) (1) The policies issued by the authority shall not be subject to assessment for, nor shall any authority policyholder be eligible for benefits from, the California Insurance Guaranty Association.

(2) Policies of residential earthquake insurance written by participating insurers that supplement, augment, or are in excess of the authority’s policy of basic earthquake insurance shall be subject to assessment by the California Insurance Guaranty Association and shall be covered to the extent provided in Article 14.2 (commencing with Section 1063) of Chapter 1 of Part 2 of Division 1.

(b) (1) Policies of basic residential earthquake insurance written by nonparticipating insurers shall be subject to assessment by the California Insurance Guaranty Association and shall be covered to the extent provided in Article 14.2 (commencing with Section 1063) of Chapter 1 of Part 2 of Division 1.

(2) Participating insurers of the authority shall have no obligation to pay assessments to the California Insurance Guaranty Association for covered claims obligation arising from policies of basic residential earthquake insurance written by nonparticipating insurers.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1996, Ch. 967, Sec. 18.   Effective September 27, 1996.)
-------------------------------------------

10089.35.

(a) If at any time the board determines that all the authority’s available capital may be exhausted and no source of additional funds such as assessments, reinsurance, or private capital market moneys will be available to the authority to pay policyholder claims, the board shall draw up and present to the commissioner a plan to pay policyholder claims on a pro rata basis or in installment payments. The board shall maintain sufficient capital to ensure the continued operation of the authority for the purpose of implementing the proration or installment plan. At this point, the commissioner shall adopt a schedule for reinstitution of an insurer’s statutory obligation to offer earthquake coverage by a means other than placement in the authority. In no event shall the schedule adopted pursuant to this subdivision be for a period longer than six months.

(b) Upon presentation of that plan to prorate or pay in installments, the commissioner shall order the authority to cease renewing or accepting new earthquake insurance policies and may apply to the superior court for orders or injunctions as the commissioner deems necessary to prevent any event or occurrence adverse to the authority, including, but not limited to, any or all of the following:

(1) Interference with the commissioner’s consideration and implementation of a plan for pro rata or installment payment of policyholder claims under this section.

(2) Interference with or attachment of the assets of the authority.

(3) Institution or prosecution of any actions or proceedings against the authority.

(4) The obtaining of preferences, judgments, attachments, or other liens or levies against the authority or its assets.

(5) The withholding by a participating insurer or any other person of any premium, surcharge, assessment, or other amount lawfully due and owing to the authority.

(c) Entry of orders or injunctions obtained by the commissioner upon the application permitted by subdivision (a) shall not vest the superior court with general jurisdiction over the business or assets of the authority or any plan for the pro rata or installment payment of policyholder claims under this section, and the superior court’s jurisdiction shall be limited to the entry and enforcement of those orders and injunctions.

(d) The State of California shall have no liability for payment of claims in excess of funds available pursuant to this chapter. The State of California, and any of the funds of the State of California, shall have no obligations whatsoever for payment of claims or costs arising from this act, except as specifically provided in this act.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1996, Ch. 968, Sec. 10.   Effective September 27, 1996.)
-------------------------------------------

10089.36.

In the event a natural disaster program is enacted by Congress, the panel shall convene and prepare a plan to dissolve the authority or conform this act with the federal program. Following its deliberations, the panel shall recommend a plan of action to the board and the Legislature.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1996, Ch. 968, Sec. 11.   Effective September 27, 1996.)
-------------------------------------------

10089.37.

The board shall set aside in each calendar year an amount equal to 5 percent of investment income accruing on the authority’s invested funds, or five million dollars ($5,000,000), whichever is less, if deemed actuarially sound by a consulting actuary employed or hired by the authority, to be maintained as a subaccount in the California Earthquake Authority Fund. The authority shall use those funds to fund the establishment and operation of an Earthquake Loss Mitigation Fund. In the event a set-aside of mitigation-related funds may impair the actuarial soundness of the authority, the board may delay the implementation of this section. Any delay shall be reported to the Legislature and the commissioner and reported publicly.

(History: Added by Stats. 1995, Ch. 944, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1996.)
-------------------------------------------

10089.38.

Upon the development and implementation of an economical system satisfactory to the board and the commissioner to prevent misapplication of mitigation funds, the Earthquake Loss Mitigation Fund may be applied to supply grants and loans or loan guarantees to dwelling owners who wish to retrofit their homes to protect against earthquake damage.

(History: Added by Stats. 1995, Ch. 944, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1996.)
-------------------------------------------

10089.39.

(a) The operational rules of the Earthquake Loss Mitigation Fund shall be part of the authority’s plan of operations.

(b) On or before July 1, 2000, the authority shall establish in the operational rules of the Earthquake Loss Mitigation Fund, a plan for the expedited expansion of the residential retrofit program statewide. The program shall include personnel and administrative requirements and all other programmatic specifications necessary to the implementation of the plan.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1999, Ch. 715, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 2000.)
-------------------------------------------

10089.395.

(a) The Legislature finds and declares that there exists the California Residential Mitigation Program, also known as the CRMP, a joint powers authority created in 2012 by agreement between the California Earthquake Authority and the Office of Emergency Services.

(b) Any funds appropriated by the Legislature for the purpose of funding the CRMP’s implementation of the grant program described in this section shall be to the department, which shall provide the funds to the California Earthquake Authority’s Earthquake Loss Mitigation Fund, pursuant to subdivision (k) of Section 10089.7 and according to the terms of an agreement negotiated by the department and the authority. The authority, the prime
 funder of the CRMP, shall then transfer the funds from its Earthquake Loss Mitigation Fund to the CRMP for further implementation and expansion of the CRMP’s Earthquake Brace and Bolt program, upon actions by the respective governing boards of the authority and the CRMP, authorizing and accepting that transfer. The CRMP shall, pursuant to the requirements of this section, implement the grant program and make grants that assist a qualifying owner of a single-family residential structure by defraying the owner’s costs of seismic retrofitting of the structure.

(c) The CRMP may make a grant to an applicant who satisfies all of the following:

(1) The applicant is an owner of record of, and lives in, the structure to be retrofitted.

(2) The structure is a single-family, detached, residential building composed of one to
 four dwelling units.

(3) The structure meets structural requirements established pursuant to subdivision (e).

(4) The structure is located in a high-risk earthquake area, based on criteria established pursuant to subdivision (e).

(5) The retrofit work qualifies as work for which the applicant may receive a grant, based on criteria established pursuant to subdivision (e).

(d) Subject to the policies, procedures, and criteria adopted pursuant to subdivision (e), a grant shall not exceed the lesser of 75 percent of the cost of the qualifying retrofit work, or three thousand dollars ($3,000).

(e) The governing board of the CRMP shall adopt policies and procedures to implement this section,
 including, but not limited to, establishing structural eligibility requirements for structures that will receive a grant for seismic retrofit work, defining criteria for determining whether a structure is located in a high-earthquake-risk area, and defining criteria for seismic retrofit work that qualifies as work eligible for receipt of a grant, which may be awarded in amounts of greater or lesser than the amounts established by subdivision (d). In adopting those policies and procedures, the governing board shall provide notice and opportunity for public review and comment, publish the policies and procedures on the CRMP’s Internet Web site, and otherwise make the policies and procedures available to the public.

(History: Added by Stats. 2015, Ch. 25, Sec. 41.   (SB 84)   Effective June 24, 2015.)
-------------------------------------------

10089.396.

(a) In administering the Earthquake Brace and Bolt program pursuant to Section 10089.395, the California Residential Mitigation Program (CRMP) shall do both of the following:

(1) Provide outreach to low-income households to increase awareness of the Earthquake Brace and Bolt program in those communities where the program is offered.

(2) Set aside at least 10 percent of the funds available each year for the program pursuant to Section 10089.395 to provide supplemental grants to homeowners in low-income households who were selected to receive grants pursuant to subdivision (c) of Section 10089.395.

(A) A
 homeowner in a low-income household may apply for a supplemental grant, which shall be awarded on a first-come-first-served basis until the funding set aside for supplemental grants is exhausted.

(B) The supplemental grant shall be in an amount as necessary to provide the homeowner in the low-income household with 90 percent of the retrofit costs remaining after payment of the grant awarded to that homeowner pursuant to subdivision (c) of Section 10089.395.

(C) Any unexpended supplemental grant funding shall be available to provide grants to other eligible applicants on the waiting list.

(b) For purposes of this section, “low-income household” means a household that has an income at or below 80 percent of the median household income in California.

(History: Added by Stats. 2019, Ch. 219, Sec. 1.   (AB 548)   Effective January 1, 2020.)
-------------------------------------------

10089.397.

(a) The Legislature finds and declares that there exists the California Residential Mitigation Program, also known as the CRMP, a joint powers authority created in 2012 by agreement between the California Earthquake Authority and the Office of Emergency Services.

(b) Any funds appropriated by the Legislature for the purpose of funding the CRMP’s implementation of the grant program described in this section shall be to the department, which shall provide the funds to the California Earthquake Authority’s Earthquake Loss Mitigation Fund, pursuant to subdivision (k) of Section 10089.7 and according to the terms of an agreement negotiated by the department and the authority.
 The authority, the prime funder of the CRMP, shall then transfer the funds from its Earthquake Loss Mitigation Fund to the CRMP for further implementation and expansion of the CRMP’s Earthquake Brace and Bolt program, upon actions by the respective governing boards of the authority and the CRMP, authorizing and accepting that transfer. The CRMP may, pursuant to the requirements of this section, implement the grant program and on or after July 1, 2015, make grants that assist a qualifying owner of a multiunit residential structure by defraying the owner’s cost of seismic retrofitting of the structure.

(c) The CRMP may make a grant to an applicant who satisfies all of the following:

(1) The applicant is an owner of record of the structure to be retrofitted and has secured the written consent of all other owners of the structure to make a grant application.

(2) The structure is a residential building of not fewer than two, but not more than 10, dwelling units.

(3) The dwelling units in the structure are occupied by tenants who are members of “lower income households,” as defined in subdivision (a) of Section 50079.5 of the Health and Safety Code.

(4) The structure meets structural requirements established pursuant to subdivision (d).

(5) The structure is located in a high-risk earthquake area, based on criteria established pursuant to subdivision (d).

(6) The retrofit work qualifies as work for which the applicant may receive a
 grant, based on criteria established pursuant to subdivision (d).

(d) The governing board of the CRMP shall adopt policies and procedures necessary to implement this section, including, but not limited to, establishing the means by which the applicant may satisfy the tenant-related economic eligibility criteria for the program, establishing structural eligibility requirements for a structure that will receive seismic retrofit work, defining criteria for determining whether a structure is located in a high-risk earthquake area, defining criteria for seismic retrofit work that qualifies as work eligible for receipt of a grant, and defining criteria for the determination of the amount of a grant awarded pursuant to the program created by this section. In adopting those policies and procedures, the governing board shall provide notice and opportunity for public review and comment, publish the policies and procedures on
 the CRMP’s Internet Web site, and otherwise make the policies and procedures available to the public.

(History: Added by Stats. 2015, Ch. 25, Sec. 42.   (SB 84)   Effective June 24, 2015.)
-------------------------------------------

10089.40.

(a) Rates established by the authority shall be actuarially sound so as to not be excessive, inadequate, or unfairly discriminatory. Rates shall be established based on the best available scientific information for assessing the risk of earthquake frequency, severity, and loss. Rates shall be equivalent for equivalent risks. Factors the board shall consider in adopting rates include, but are not limited to, the following:

(1) Location of the insured property and its proximity to earthquake faults and to other geological factors that affect the risk of earthquake or damage from earthquake.

(2) The soil type on which the insured dwelling is built.

(3) Construction type and features of the insured dwelling.

(4) Age of the insured dwelling.

(5) The presence of earthquake hazard reduction factors, including those set forth in subdivision (a) of Section 10089.2.

(b) (1) If scientific information from geologists, seismologists, or similar experts that assesses the frequency or severity of risk of earthquake is considered in setting rates or in arriving at the modeling assumptions upon which those rates are based, the information may be used to establish differentials among risks only if the information, assumptions, and methodology used are consistent with the available geophysical data and the state of the art of scientific knowledge within the scientific community.

(2) Scientific information from geologists, seismologists, or similar experts shall not be conclusive to support the establishment of different rates between the most populous rating territories in the northern and southern regions of the state unless that information, as analyzed by experts such as the United States Geological Survey, the California Division of Mines and Geology, and experts in the scientific or academic community, clearly shows a higher risk of earthquake frequency, severity, or loss between those most populous rating territories to support those differences.

(3) It is not the intent of the Legislature in adopting this subdivision to mandate a uniform statewide flat rate for California Earthquake Authority policies.

(c) The classification system established by the board shall not be adjusted or tempered in any way to provide rates lower than are justified for classifications that present a high risk of loss or higher than are justified for classifications that present a low risk of loss.

(d) Policyholders who have retrofitted their homes to withstand earthquake shake damage according to standards and to the extent set by the board shall enjoy a premium discount or credit of 5 percent on the authority-issued policy of residential earthquake coverage. For residential dwellings, the 5-percent discount shall be applicable if the dwelling, at a minimum, meets the following requirements: the dwelling was built prior to 1979, is tied to the foundation, has cripple walls braced with plywood or its equivalent, and the water heater is secured to the building frame. For mobilehomes, the 5-percent discount shall be applicable if the mobilehome, at a minimum, is reinforced by an earthquake resistant bracing system certified by the Department of Housing and Community Development. The board may approve a premium discount or credit above 5 percent, as long as the discount or credit is determined actuarially sound by the authority.

(e) All rates shall be approved by the commissioner prior to their use.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2001, Ch. 745, Sec. 154.   Effective October 12, 2001.)
-------------------------------------------

10089.41.

(a) The offer of an authority policy by a participating insurer shall constitute a mode of insurer compliance with Chapter 8.5 (commencing with Section 10081) of Part 1 of Division 2, and as set forth in Section 10084.

(b) If the authority ceases operation for any reason, including, but not limited to, repeal of this chapter or insolvency of the authority, participating carriers shall no longer be able to satisfy the requirement to offer residential earthquake insurance coverage by placement within the authority. The commissioner shall adopt a schedule in accordance with subdivision (a) of Section 10089.35 to establish when participating carriers shall be required to offer coverage by another mode authorized pursuant to Chapter 8.5 (commencing with Section 10081) of Part 1 of Division 2 to those policyholders for whom they write the underlying policies of residential property insurance.

(c) If the authority ceases operation pursuant to a statute enacted by the Legislature, that statute shall determine the duty of participating insurers to provide earthquake insurance pursuant to Chapter 8.5 (commencing with Section 10081). Chapter 8.5 (commencing with Section 10081) shall remain in effect unless specifically repealed by that statute.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1996, Ch. 968, Sec. 13.   Effective September 27, 1996.)
-------------------------------------------

10089.42.

(a) At least once each year a participating insurer shall provide each of its residential property insureds with marketing documents produced at the authority’s expense.

(b) This section shall become operative on January 1, 2016.

(History: Added by Stats. 2014, Ch. 419, Sec. 11.   (AB 2064)   Effective January 1, 2015.)
-------------------------------------------

10089.43.

Upon termination of the authority by the Legislature, its remaining funds shall be transferred to the General Fund unless otherwise directed by the Legislature.

(History: Added by Stats. 1995, Ch. 944, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1996.)
-------------------------------------------

10089.44.

Notwithstanding any other provision of law, premiums collected by the authority shall be exempt from collection of the state’s insurance premium tax, and the amount of tax foregone by the state shall be considered for all purposes a contribution by the state and its citizens to the capital and operating revenues of the authority.

No funds contributed to, or collected or held by, the authority shall be available to meet the general obligations of the state unless the authority has been terminated and wound up, and all funds due or owing to any person pursuant to this act have been paid, held in reserve, or returned.

(History: Added by Stats. 1995, Ch. 944, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1996.)
-------------------------------------------

10089.46.

Bonds issued under this chapter shall not be a debt or liability of the state or of any political subdivision of the state, or a pledge of the full faith and credit of the state or of any political subdivision, but shall be payable solely from the funds provided in this chapter.

(History: Added by Stats. 1995, Ch. 944, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1996.)
-------------------------------------------

10089.47.

Bonds issued by the authority are legal investments for all trust funds, the funds of all insurance companies, banks, trust companies, executors, administrators, trustees, and other fiduciaries. The bonds are securities that may legally be deposited with, and received by, any state or municipal officer or agency or political subdivision of the state for any purpose for which the deposit of bonds or obligations of the state is now, or may hereafter be, authorized by law, including deposits to secure public funds.

(History: Added by Stats. 1995, Ch. 944, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1996.)
-------------------------------------------

10089.48.

Interest earned on any bonds issued by the authority shall at all times be free from state personal income tax and corporate income tax.

(History: Added by Stats. 1995, Ch. 944, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1996.)
-------------------------------------------

10089.49.

The state hereby pledges to and agrees with the holders of bonds that the state will not limit, alter, or restrict the rights hereby vested in the authority to fulfill each pledge of revenues and any other terms of any agreement made with or for the benefit of the holders of bonds or in any way impair the rights or remedies of the holders of bonds.

(History: Added by Stats. 1995, Ch. 944, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1996.)
-------------------------------------------

10089.50.

The Treasurer may from time to time enter into one or more credit facilities permitting the authority to draw an amount up to one billion dollars ($1,000,000,000) with payment, interest rate, indemnity, compensation, security, default, remedy, and other terms and conditions as determined by the authority. All drawings under these credit facilities shall be available as funding for the authority as provided in Section 10089.29.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1996, Ch. 967, Sec. 19.   Effective September 27, 1996.)
-------------------------------------------

10089.51.

The authority shall have the power to pledge to the providers of credit facilities and to the owners of bonds the surcharges imposed or to be imposed pursuant to subdivision (b) of Section 10089.29 to secure payment of all obligations of the authority under those credit facilities and bonds, respectively. A pledge of those surcharges shall constitute a lien and security interest that shall immediately attach to the surcharges whether or not imposed or collected at the time the pledge is made, and shall be effective, valid, and binding and enforceable against the authority, the Treasurer, the beneficiaries of the basic residential earthquake insurance issued from time to time, and all others asserting rights in the surcharges to the extent set forth, and in accordance with, the terms of the pledge contained in the credit facilities or bonds, as the case may be, whether or not those parties have notice of the pledge and without the need for any physical delivery, recordation, filing, or further act.

(History: Added by Stats. 1995, Ch. 944, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1996.)
-------------------------------------------

10089.52.

Nothing in Section 10089.50 or 10089.51 is intended to limit the applicability to the authority of any provision of Section 5450 or subdivision (c) of Section 5922 of the Government Code.

(History: Added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 967, Sec. 20.   Effective September 27, 1996.)
-------------------------------------------

10089.53.

(a) Any insurer that withdraws from the authority under Section 10089.19 while bonds or other debt is outstanding shall impose annually a premium surcharge on each policy of residential earthquake insurance written by it equal in percentage amount, calculated as a percentage of the basic residential earthquake insurance premium, to the percentage amount of the surcharge being imposed in that year by the authority pursuant to subdivision (b) of Section 10089.29. That insurer shall remit promptly all those surcharges collected by it to the trustee appointed pursuant to Section 10089.22. The surcharges shall be used solely to repay the bonded indebtedness or other debt issued pursuant to subdivision (a) of Section 10089.29. If the sum of the surcharges remitted to the trustee pursuant to this section plus the amount of the surcharges imposed by the authority pursuant to subdivision (b) of Section 10089.29 would exceed the amount authorized by that provision, then surcharges of the authority shall be reduced by an amount equal to that excess.

(b) Should the Legislature and Governor approve legislation that causes the authority to cease operation while bonds or other debt are outstanding, participating insurers shall impose annually a premium surcharge on each policy of residential earthquake insurance written by them equal in percentage amount, calculated as a percentage of the basic residential earthquake insurance premium, to the percentage amount of the surcharge being imposed in that year by the authority pursuant to subdivision (b) of Section 10089.29. Those insurers shall remit promptly all these surcharges collected by them to the trustee appointed pursuant to Section 10089.22. The surcharges shall be used solely to repay the bonded indebtedness or other debt issued pursuant to subdivision (a) of Section 10089.29. If the sum of the surcharges remitted to the trustee pursuant to this section plus the amount of the surcharges imposed by the authority pursuant to subdivision (b) of Section 10089.29 would exceed the amount authorized by that provision, then surcharges of the authority shall be reduced by an amount equal to that excess.

(History: Added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 967, Sec. 21.   Effective September 27, 1996.)
-------------------------------------------

10089.54.

(a) Unless authorized by a statute enacted subsequent to the effective date of this section, the authority shall cease writing new earthquake insurance policies 180 days after implementation by both the Federal National Mortgage Association (“Fannie Mae”) and the Federal Home Loan Mortgage Association (“Freddie Mac”) of policies to require earthquake insurance for any single-family residential structure, other than a condominium unit or townhome, as a condition of purchasing a mortgage or trust deed secured by that structure. Notwithstanding this restriction, the authority shall continue to renew its existing earthquake insurance policies and shall accept applications for earthquake insurance from residential property insurance policyholders of participating insurers in accordance with subdivision (b) of Section 10086.

(b) In the event that both the Federal National Mortgage Association (“Fannie Mae”) and the Federal Home Loan Mortgage Association (“Freddie Mac”) have proposed to implement policies to require earthquake insurance for any single-family residential structure, other than a condominium unit or townhome, as a condition of purchasing a mortgage or trust deed secured by that structure, it is the intent of the Legislature that the Legislature should convene to consider whether the authority should continue to write new earthquake insurance policies, with or without modification, or to cease writing new earthquake insurance policies.

(History: Added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 969, Sec. 4.   Effective January 1, 1997.)
-------------------------------------------

10089.55.

The board shall conduct the affairs of the authority with respect to transacting earthquake insurance, including administering the California Earthquake Authority Fund. Except as provided in paragraph (2) of subdivision (a) of Section 10089.6, the board has no authority to administer the Wildfire Fund. At every meeting of the board, the board shall post an agenda that clearly identifies the meeting as relating to the business of earthquake insurance.

(History: Added by Stats. 2019, Ch. 81, Sec. 6.   (AB 111)   Effective July 12, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 8.9. Insurance Mediation [10089.70. - 10089.83.]

10089.70.

(a) The department shall establish a program for the mediation of the disputes between insured complainants and insurers arising pursuant to any of the following:

(1) A claim that arises under a homeowners’ insurance policy and that involves loss due to a fire for which the Governor has declared a state of emergency pursuant to Section 8558 of the Government Code. The department may refer to mediation any dispute covered by this paragraph in which the parties to the contract wish to discuss possible payments beyond policy limits.

(2) A claim that arises under a policy covering earthquake damage and that involves loss due to an earthquake for which the Governor has declared a state of emergency pursuant to Section 8558 of the Government Code. With respect to disputes arising under this paragraph, the program shall apply only to personal lines of insurance related to residential coverage.

(3) A claim that arises under automobile collision coverage or automobile physical damage coverage, in a policy as defined in Section 660.
